Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  There is appropriated to the  Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $32,559,579.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$40,770,646 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  the
State Fire Marshal.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $599,875
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of the State Fire
Marshal.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5036 (HB 5036-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5036 (HB 5036-A) Page 2